Utah statutes.
78B-6-1232.   Who may not be purchaser.

(1)  A referee or any person for the referee's benefit may not be interested in any purchase.

(2)  A guardian of a minor party may not be interested in the purchase of any real property which is the subject of an action under this part except for the benefit of the minor.

(3)  All sales contrary to the provisions of this section are void.

